Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,747,800  for the Public
Transit Division’s Elderly and People with Disabilities Transportation Program.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for the Rail
Division’s Passenger Rail Program.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,135,799 for  debt service on
safety improvement projects.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvement................. $ 5,639,376
(2) Maintenance and emergency
relief programs ......................... $516,843,383
(3) Preservation program ............... $255,506,413
(4) Bridge program......................... $270,723,941
(5) Operations program .................. $224,187,683
(6) Modernization program............. $326,749,992
(7) Special programs....................... $355,759,048
(8) Local government program ....... $393,303,442
(9) Driver and motor vehicle
services ..................................... $231,483,759
(10) Motor carrier transportation .... $ 64,913,624
(11) Transportation program
development.............................. $143,780,776
Enrolled Senate Bill 5540 (SB 5540-A) Page 1
(12) Public transit ............................ $ 28,233,927
(13) Rail............................................ $ 44,684,798
(14) Transportation safety ............... $ 18,503,103
(15) Central services ........................ $242,478,509
(16) Debt service .............................. $415,126,500
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 4 of this 2017 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Driver and motor
vehicle services ......................... $ 2,023,588
(2) Transportation program
development.............................. $ 197,347
(3) Public transit ............................ $ 67,555,047
(4) Rail............................................ $ 16,394,354
(5) Transportation safety ............... $ 19,466,373
(6) Central services ........................ $ 289,651
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$120,644,222 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service.
SECTION 7. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from federal funds for debt service  on Build America Bonds are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 8. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from the Oregon Transportation  Infrastructure Fund established under
ORS 367.015 for debt service and for internally reimbursed expenditures are not limited.
SECTION 9. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5540 (SB 5540-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5540 (SB 5540-A) Page 3